Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-452
Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine; possession; penalty.

No person shall possess ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 5.